District of Columbia statutes.
51-135

Reporting requirement.

The Director shall each year submit to the Mayor, for inclusion in the Mayor’s report to the Council, as required by § 51-113(c), the number of individuals who received benefits for separation from employment due to domestic violence.

History

Aug. 28, 1935, ch. 794, § 35
as added June 19, 2004, D.C. Law 15-171, § 2(b), 51 DCR 4701